Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.185

Annual membership meetings.

(1) A credit union's annual membership meeting shall be held at such time and in such manner as the bylaws prescribe, and shall be conducted according to the rules of procedure approved by the board.

(2) Notice of the annual membership meetings of a credit union shall be given as provided in the bylaws of the credit union.

[ 2019 c 19 s 1; 1997 c 397 s 12; 1987 c 338 s 2; 1984 c 31 s 20.]